apertium-fin-eng.eng.lexc
LEXICON V_SPEAK

%<inf%>:speak # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:speak # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:speaks # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:spoke # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:speaking # ;

LEXICON V_SAY

%<inf%>:y # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:y # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:ys # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:id # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:ying # ;

LEXICON V_GO

%<inf%>:go # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:go # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:goes # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:went # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:going # ;

LEXICON V_FIND

%<inf%>:find # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:find # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:finds # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:found # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:finding # ;

LEXICON V_BREAK

%<inf%>:break # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:break # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:breaks # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:broke # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:breaking # ;

LEXICON V_BUY

%<inf%>:buy # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:buy # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:buys # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:bought # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:buying # ;

LEXICON V_BRING

%<inf%>:bring # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:bring # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:brings # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:brought # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:bringing # ;

LEXICON V_THINK

%<inf%>:think # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:think # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:thinks # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:thought # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:thinking # ;

LEXICON V_TEACH

%<inf%>:teach # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:teach # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:teaches # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:taught # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:teaching # ;

LEXICON V_LEAVE

%<inf%>:leave # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:leave # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:leaves # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:left # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:leaving # ;

LEXICON V_GIVE

%<inf%>:give # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:give # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:gives # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:gave # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:giving # ;

LEXICON V_CHOOSE

%<inf%>:choose # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:choose # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:chooses # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:chose # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:choosing # ;

LEXICON V_THROW

%<inf%>:throw # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:throw # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:throws # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:threw # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:throwing # ;

LEXICON V_TAKE

%<inf%>:take # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:take # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:takes # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:took # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:taking # ;

LEXICON V_SMELL

%<inf%>:l # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:l # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:ls # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:lt # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:ling # ;

LEXICON V_SHOW

%<inf%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:s # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:ed # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:ing # ;

LEXICON V_SHOOT

%<inf%>:shoot # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:shoot # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:shoots # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:shot # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:shooting # ;

LEXICON V_LAY

%<inf%>:lay # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:lay # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:lays # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:laid # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:laying # ;

LEXICON V_GROW

%<inf%>:grow # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:grow # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:grows # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:grew # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:growing # ;

LEXICON V_FEEL

%<inf%>:feel # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:feel # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:feels # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:felt # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:feeling # ;

LEXICON V_HOLD

%<inf%>:hold # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:hold # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:holds # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:held # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:holding # ;


LEXICON V_BURN

%<inf%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:s # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:t # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:ing # ;

LEXICON V_BEGIN

%<inf%>:begin # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:begin # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:begins # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:began # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:beginning # ;



LEXICON V_TRAVEL

%<inf%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:s # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:led # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:ling # ;

LEXICON V_PUT

%<inf%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:s # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:ting # ;

LEXICON V_HIT

%<inf%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:s # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:ted # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:ting # ;

LEXICON V_RUB

%<inf%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:s # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:bed # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:bing # ;

LEXICON V_STOP

%<inf%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:s # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:ped # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:ping # ;

LEXICON V_DIG

%<inf%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:s # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:ged # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:ging # ;

LEXICON V_STUN

%<inf%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:s # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:ned # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:ning # ;

LEXICON V_HUM

%<inf%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:s # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:med # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:ming # ;

LEXICON V_SLUR

%<inf%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:s # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:red # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:ring # ;

LEXICON V_READ

%<inf%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:s # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:ing # ;

LEXICON V_BID

%<inf%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:s # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:ding # ;


LEXICON Determiners

the%<det%>%<def%>:the # ; ! ""
a%<det%>%<ind%>:a # ; ! "" ! Dir/LR
an%<det%>%<ind%>:an # ; ! "" ! Dir/LR
a%<det%>%<ind%>:%~a # ; ! "" ! Dir/RL

her%<det%>%<pos%>%<sp%>:her # ; ! ""
his%<det%>%<pos%>%<sp%>:his # ; ! ""
their%<det%>%<pos%>%<sp%>:their # ; ! ""

LEXICON Pronouns

other%<prn%>:other N ; ! "" ! Determiner/Pronoun
another%<prn%>:another N ; ! "" ! Determiner/Pronoun
some%<prn%>:some # ; ! "" ! Determiner/Pronoun
what%<prn%>%<itg%>:what # ; ! "" ! Pronoun
same%<prn%>:same N ;

something%<prn%>:something N ; ! ""
nothing%<prn%>:nothing N ; ! ""
anything%<prn%>:anything N ; ! ""!! Pronoun
someone%<prn%>:someone N ; 
all%<prn%>:all N ;

this%<prn%>:this # ;

I%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:I # ; ! ""
I%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:me # ; ! ""
I%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:my # ; ! ""
I%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:mine # ; ! ""
you%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:you # ; ! ""
you%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:you # ; ! ""
you%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:your # ; ! ""
you%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:you # ; ! ""
you%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:you # ; ! ""
you%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:your # ; ! ""
she%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:she # ; ! ""
she%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:her # ; ! ""
she%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:hers # ; ! ""
it%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:it # ; ! ""
it%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:it # ; ! ""
it%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:its # ; ! ""
he%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:he # ; ! ""
he%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:him # ; ! ""
he%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:his # ; ! ""
we%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<mg%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:we # ; ! ""
we%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<mg%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:us # ; ! ""
we%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<mg%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:our # ; ! ""
we%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<mg%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ours # ; ! ""
they%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:they # ; ! ""
they%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:them # ; ! ""
they%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:their # ; ! ""
they%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:they # ; ! ""
they%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:them # ; ! ""
they%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:their # ; ! ""

these%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:these # ; ! ""
those%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:those # ; ! ""

theirs%<prn%>%<pos%>%<mf%>%<sp%>:theirs # ; ! ""
his%<prn%>%<pos%>%<mf%>%<sp%>:his # ; ! ""


both%<prn%>%<ind%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:both # ; ! ""

which%<prn%>:which # ;

LEXICON PROPN

%<sg%>%<nom%>:0 # ;
%<sg%>%<gen%>:'s # ;
%<pl%>%<nom%>:s # ;
%<pl%>%<gen%>:s' # ;

LEXICON PROPN_JAMES

%<sg%>%<nom%>:0 # ;
%<sg%>%<gen%>:' # ;
%<pl%>%<nom%>:0 # ;
%<pl%>%<gen%>:' # ;

LEXICON Verbs
begin%<vblex%>:0 V_BEGIN ;
bid%<vblex%>:bid V_BID ;
break%<vblex%>:0 V_BREAK ;
break%<vblex%>:0 V_BREAK ; ! 
bring%<vblex%>:0 V_BRING ;
bring%<vblex%>:0 V_BRING ; !
burn%<vblex%>:burn V_BURN ;
buy%<vblex%>:0 V_BUY ;
can%<vblex%>:0 V_STUN ;
carry%<vblex%>:carr V_BUY ;
chap%<vblex%>:chap V_STOP ;
chat%<vblex%>:chat V_HIT ;
choose%<vblex%>:0 V_CHOOSE ;
chug%<vblex%>:chug V_DIG ;
clip%<vblex%>:clip V_STOP ;
cup%<vblex%>:cup V_STOP ;
cut%<vblex%>:cut V_READ ;
dig%<vblex%>:dig V_DIG ;
drop%<vblex%>:drop V_STOP ;
drum%<vblex%>:drum V_HUM ;
exit%<vblex%>:exit V_HIT ;
fan%<vblex%>:fan V_STUN ;
feel%<vblex%>:0 V_FEEL ;
fit%<vblex%>:fit V_HIT ;
give%<vblex%>:0 V_GIVE ;
go%<vblex%>:0 V_GO ; ! ""
grow%<vblex%>:0 V_GROW ;
hit%<vblex%>:hit V_HIT ;
hold%<vblex%>:0 V_HOLD ;
hop%<vblex%>:hop V_STOP ;
hum%<vblex%>:hum V_HUM ;
input%<vblex%>:input V_HIT ;
jar%<vblex%>:jar V_SLUR ;
lap%<vblex%>:lap V_STOP ;
lay%<vblex%>:0 V_LAY ;
lead%<vblex%>:lead V_READ ;
leave%<vblex%>:0 V_LEAVE ;
let%<vblex%>:let V_READ ;
lug%<vblex%>:lug V_DIG ;
pet%<vblex%>:pet V_HIT ;
pop%<vblex%>:pop V_STOP ;
put%<vblex%>:put V_PUT ;
put%<vblex%>:put V_READ ;
read%<vblex%>:read V_READ ;
rib%<vblex%>:rib V_RUB ;
rip%<vblex%>:rip V_STOP ;
rub%<vblex%>:rub V_RUB ;
say%<vblex%>:sa V_SAY  ; ! ""
scan%<vblex%>:scan V_STUN ;
set%<vblex%>:set V_PUT ;
shoot%<vblex%>:sho V_SHOOT ;
shop%<vblex%>:shop V_STOP ;
show%<vblex%>:show V_SHOW ;
slip%<vblex%>:slip V_STOP ;
slur%<vblex%>:slur V_SLUR ;
smell%<vblex%>:smel V_SMELL ;
snap%<vblex%>:snap V_STOP ;
speak%<vblex%>:0 V_SPEAK ; ! ""
spin%<vblex%>:spin V_STUN;
split%<vblex%>:split V_HIT ;
stir%<vblex%>:stir V_SLUR ;
stop%<vblex%>:stop V_STOP ;
strap%<vblex%>:strap V_STOP ;
stun%<vblex%>:stun V_STUN ;
submit%<vblex%>:submit V_HIT ;
sway%<vblex%>:swa V_SAY ;
take%<vblex%>:0 V_TAKE ;
teach%<vblex%>:0 V_TEACH ;
think%<vblex%>:0 V_THINK ; ! ""
throw%<vblex%>:0 V_THROW ;
tip%<vblex%>:tip V_STOP ;
transmit%<vblex%>:transmit V_HIT ;
travel%<vblex%>:travel V_TRAVEL ;
tut%<vblex%>:tut V_HIT ;
visit%<vblex%>:visit V_HIT ;
wag%<vblex%>:wag V_DIG ;
wet%<vblex%>:wet V_HIT ;
